Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4055.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Information security incident” means a substantial incident that leads to one or
more of the following impacts:
(A) Substantial loss of confidentiality, integrity or availability of a public body’s infor-
mation system.
(B) Compromise in the safety and resilience of a public body’s operational systems and
processes.
(C) Disruption of a public body’s ability to engage in business, carry on operations or
deliver services.
(D) Unauthorized access to a public body’s information system or nonpublic information,
when the impact is caused by a compromise of a third-party information service or data
hosting provider.
(b) “Information system” means a system of computers and related hardware, software,
storage media and networks and any other means by which a public body collects, uses or
manages the public body’s information resources.
(c) “Public body” means:
(A) A local government, as defined in ORS 174.116.
(B) A local service district, as defined in ORS 174.116.
(C) A special government body, as defined in ORS 174.117.
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 301

HB 4055
(d) “Ransomware incident” means an information security incident in which a person
introduces software to gain unauthorized access to or encrypt, modify or render unavailable
a public body’s data for the purposes of demanding or compelling the public body to pay a
ransom.
(2)(a) A public body shall, within 48 hours of discovering an information security incident
or ransomware incident:
(A) Notify the State Chief Information Officer of the information security incident or
ransomware incident; and
(B) Submit a report to the State Chief Information Officer that describes the actions the
public body has taken or must reasonably take to prevent, mitigate or recover from damage
to, unauthorized access to, unauthorized modifications or deletions of or other impairments
of the integrity of the public body’s information system.
(b) The State Chief Information Officer shall prescribe the format in which a report must
be submitted under this section.
(3) The State Chief Information Officer shall establish an information security incident
notification and reporting system that a public body shall use to provide notification or
submit a report, as required under this section, in a timely, secure and confidential manner.
The system must allow the State Chief Information Officer to:
(a) Securely accept from public bodies information security incident or ransomware in-
cident notifications and reports;
(b) Track and identify trends in information security incidents and ransomware incidents
that are reported through the system; and
(c) Provide reports on the types of incidents, threat indicators, defensive measures and
entities that are reported through the system.
(4)(a) An information security incident or ransomware incident report that is submitted
under this section is exempt from public disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478 and must
be treated as confidential.
(b) The State Chief Information Officer may share information concerning an informa-
tion security incident or ransomware incident report with:
(A) The Oregon Cybersecurity Center of Excellence established under ORS 276A.555, if
the information helps the center carry out the center’s purpose as described under ORS
276A.555;
(B) Federal, state or local law enforcement authorities; and
(C) Any other entity as the State Chief Information Officer determines is appropriate.
(c) The State Chief Information Officer may anonymize and share information related to
threat indicators and defensive measures to assist in preventing information security inci-
dents or ransomware incidents.
(5) The State Chief Information Officer shall maintain a webpage that provides in-
structions on how a public body may provide notification and submit a report as described
under subsection (2) of this section. The instructions must describe, at a minimum:
(a) The types of information security incidents and ransomware incidents that a public
body is required to report; and
(b) Any information a public body should provide when notifying the State Chief Infor-
mation Officer of an information security incident or ransomware incident.
(6)(a) The State Chief Information Officer shall submit to the Governor and submit to,
[2]

HB 4055
and present in an appropriate hearing or other proceeding before, the Joint Legislative
Committee on Information Management and Technology an annual report concerning any
notifications and reports the State Chief Information Officer receives from public bodies
under this section. The annual report must include, at a minimum, for the preceding year:
(A) Information on the number of notifications the State Chief Information Officer re-
ceived;
(B) A description of the types of information security incidents or ransomware incidents
that were reported; and
(C) The type of public bodies that submitted notifications.
(b) The annual report described in paragraph (a) of this subsection may not include in-
formation security information or other materials that are exempt from disclosure under
ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
SECTION 2. (1) Section 1 of this 2026 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2026.
(2) The State Chief Information Officer may adopt rules and take any other action before
the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the
State Chief Information Officer to undertake and exercise, on and after the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers conferred
on the State Chief Information Officer by section 1 of this 2026 Act.
(3) No later than 90 days after the effective date of this 2026 Act, the State Chief Infor-
mation Officer shall:
(a) Establish the information security incident notification and reporting system de-
scribed under section 1 (3) of this 2026 Act; and
(b) Create and maintain the webpage described under section 1 (5) of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.

[3]